src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kouv_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kouv: # Noun 93 'eng /est kaev/fin' - full paradigm
     kouv+N+Sg+Nom: kouv
     kouv+N+Sg+Gen: kouv
     kouv+N+Sg+Par: kouvõ
     kouv+N+Sg+Dat: kouvõn
     kouv+N+Sg+Ins: kouvkõks
     kouv+N+Sg+Ill: kouvõ
     kouv+N+Sg+Ela: kouvstõ
     kouv+N+Pl+Nom: kōvõd
     kouv+N+Pl+Gen: kōvõd
     kouv+N+Pl+Par: kouvḑi
     kouv+N+Pl+Dat: kōvõdõn
     kouv+N+Pl+Ins: kōvõdõks
     kouv+N+Pl+Ill: kōviž
     kouv+N+Pl+Ela: kōvist
